Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.410

Bank acquisition or control—Disapproval by director—Change of officers.

(1) The director may disapprove the acquisition of a bank within thirty days after the filing of a complete application pursuant to RCW 30A.04.405 or an extended period not exceeding an additional fifteen days if:

(a) The poor financial condition of any acquiring party might jeopardize the financial stability of the bank or might prejudice the interests of the bank depositors, borrowers, or shareholders;

(b) The plan or proposal of the acquiring party to liquidate the bank, to sell its assets, to merge it with any person, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management is not fair and reasonable to the bank's depositors, borrowers, or stockholders or is not in the public interest;

(c) The banking and business experience and integrity of any acquiring party who would control the operation of the bank indicates that approval would not be in the interest of the bank's depositors, borrowers, or shareholders;

(d) The information provided by the application is insufficient for the director to make a determination or there has been insufficient time to verify the information provided and conduct an examination of the qualification of the acquiring party; or

(e) The acquisition would not be in the public interest.

(2) An acquisition may be made prior to expiration of the disapproval period if the director issues written notice of intent not to disapprove the action.

(3) The director shall set forth the basis for disapproval of any proposed acquisition in writing and shall provide a copy of such findings and order to the applicants and to the bank involved. Such findings and order shall not be disclosed to any other party and shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW unless the findings and/or order are appealed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) Whenever such a change in control occurs, each party to the transaction shall report promptly to the director any changes or replacement of its chief executive officer, or of any director, that occurs in the next twelve-month period, including in its report a statement of the past and present business and professional affiliations of the new chief executive officer or directors.

[ 2014 c 37 s 135; 2005 c 274 s 253; 1994 c 92 s 30; 1989 c 180 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 246 s 3. Formerly RCW 30.04.410.]